Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 235 Boats and Boating

235.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter, unless the context clearly requires a different meaning:

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water;

“Motorboat” means any vessel propelled by machinery, whether or not such machinery is the principal source of propulsion, except for the following:

Boats or vessels propelled totally by a direct current battery-powered motor when used on private waters;

Boats propelled by human power employing the use of hand or foot operation; and

Federally regulated commercial vessels;

“Owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having the property in or title to a motorboat. The term includes a person entitled to the use or possession of a motorboat subject to an interest in another person, reserved or created by agreement and securing payment or performance of an obligation, but the term excludes a lessee under a lease not intended as security;

“Personal watercraft” means a vessel which uses an internal combustion engine to power a jet pump for its primary source of propulsion and is designed to be operated by a person sitting, standing, or kneeling on the vessel rather than to be operated by a person sitting or standing inside the vessel;

“Safe boating certificate” means a document attesting the successful completion of instruction, approved by the department or given by the United States Coast Guard or Coast Guard Auxiliary or the United States Power Squadron, to prepare an individual to safely operate a motorboat or personal watercraft on the waters of the Commonwealth;

“Waters of this state” means any waters within the territorial limits of this state;

“Person” means an individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association, or other entity;

“Operate” means to navigate or otherwise use a motorboat or a vessel;

“Cabinet” means the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet;

“Department” means the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources;

“License” and “certificate of number” as used herein are synonymous;

“Clerk” means county clerk;

“Division of Law Enforcement” means the Division of Law Enforcement, Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources administratively attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet;

“Title” means the certificate of title;

“Commissioner” means the commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources;

“Federally regulated commercial vessel” means any vessel holding a United States certificate of documentation with a coastwise trade endorsement;

“Marina” means a dock or basin providing moorings for motorboats and offering supply, repair, or other services for remuneration; and

“Marine sanitation device” means equipment that is identified by the United States Coast Guard as meeting the standards of the United States Environmental Protection Agency or that is approved by the Energy and Environment Cabinet, to eliminate the discharge of untreated sewage from vessels into the waters of the Commonwealth and is a device that receives, treats, retains, or discharges sewage.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 3; 1974, ch. 292, § 1; 1980, ch. 295, § 72, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 446, § 1, effective April 12, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 163, § 4, effective January 1, 1990; 1994, ch. 118, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1994, ch. 413, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 22, § 1, effective March 3, 1998; 1998, ch. 23, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 48, § 17, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 71, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 45, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, §§ 59, 60, effective June 25, 2009; 2010, ch. 24, § 513, effective July 15, 2010; 2022 ch. 197, § 8, effective April 13, 2022.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Waterways, KRS ch. 182.

235.020.
Division of Water Patrol. [Repealed.]

235.030.
Title and administration of chapter.

This chapter shall be known as the State Boating Act and shall be administered by the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, which is administratively attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet only for those limited functions and purposes expressly requested by the department to be performed by the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet. The department shall have sole discretion as to which functions shall be deemed necessary for the efficient operation of the department and the properties in its custody and control. The Transportation Cabinet shall be responsible for administering the boat numbering, registration, and titling requirements.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 2; 1974, ch. 292, § 3; 1980, ch. 295, § 74, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 446, § 3, effective April 12, 1982; 1984, ch. 404, § 2, effective July 13, 1984; 1990, ch. 391, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 118, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 23, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 48, § 19, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 46, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 61, effective June 25, 2009; 2022 ch. 197, § 9, effective April 13, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). This section was amended by 1998 Ky. Acts chs. 23 and 48. Where these Acts are not in conflict, they have been codified together. Where a conflict exists, Acts ch. 48, which was last enacted by the General Assembly, prevails under KRS

446.250

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Treatises

Kentucky Instructions to Juries (Civil), 5th Ed., Watercraft, § 26.01.

235.040.
Requirement that motorboats be registered and numbered.

Every motorboat on the waters of this state shall be numbered and currently registered in accordance with the provisions of this chapter. No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of any motorboat on such waters unless the motorboat is registered and numbered in accordance with this chapter, or in accordance with a federally approved numbering system of another state, and unless:

The certificate of number awarded to such motorboat is in full force and effect; and

The identifying number set forth in the certificate of number is displayed on each side of the bow of such motorboat.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 4; 1978, ch. 263, § 1, effective June 17, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Watercraft used as residence to be licensed by county, KRS

182.140

.

Treatises

Kentucky Instructions to Juries (Civil), 5th Ed., Watercraft, § 26.01.

235.050.
Application for title and registration — Accompanying documents.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, before the owner or operator of each motorboat required to be registered and numbered by KRS

235.040

may operate it or permit its operation upon the waters of this state, the owner shall apply for title and registration to the county clerk of the county in which he resides, except, if the motorboat is to be operated principally in a county other than the county of the owner’s residence the owner may apply for title and registration to the county clerk of the county in which the motorboat is to be principally operated. A motorboat last titled and registered in another state and purchased by a person for operation in this state shall be first titled and registered in this state by and in the name of the purchaser and not in the name of the seller. The application for title and registration shall be accompanied by:

A bill of sale, if the application is for registration of a new motorboat; or

The owner’s registration receipt if the motorboat was last registered in this state; or

A bill of sale and the previous registration receipt if last registered in another state; and

The annual registration fee.

Motorboats shall be registered annually. If an application for title and registration is filed with the county clerk prior to the annual registration date established by the Transportation Cabinet, the registration period shall include less than twelve (12) consecutive months and registration fees shall be computed at a rate of one-twelfth (1/12) of the appropriate annual registration fee set out in KRS

235.080

per month of the remaining registration period.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 5; 1974, ch. 292, § 4; 1978, ch. 233, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 263, § 2, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 163, § 5, effective January 1, 1990; 1998, ch. 289, § 1, effective July 15, 1998.

235.055.
Financing statements affecting motorboats.

The perfection and discharge of security interests and all other procedural aspects regarding motorboats shall be performed as required on other Kentucky titled property under KRS

186.045

,

186A.190

,

186A.193

,

186A.195

,

186A.200

,

186A.205

, and

186A.210

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 163, § 15, effective January 1, 1990.

235.060.
Issuance of licenses by county clerk and by department.

All original, renewal and duplicate licenses for the operation of motorboats shall be issued by the county clerk in the county in which the motorboat is registered, except the department shall issue manufacturers’ and dealers’ registrations and registrations for federal and state agencies.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 6; 1974, ch. 292, § 5; 1978, ch. 263, § 3, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 163, § 6, effective January 1, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross References.

Taxation of watercraft, KRS

136.1801

et seq.

235.065.
Year-round registration system.

All motorboat registrations required to be renewed annually may be placed in a system of registration renewal which would distribute the workload more evenly. This system to be selected by the Transportation Cabinet in consultation with the county clerks may be by the birth month of the owner of record or any other system that would take into account the seasonal nature of motorboats.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 163, § 16, effective January 1, 1990; 1990, ch. 391, § 3, effective July 13, 1990.

235.066.
County clerk to notify owner prior to registration expiration — Renewal by mail.

At least thirty (30) days prior to the expiration of registration of any motorboat previously registered in the Commonwealth as provided by KRS

235.070

, the owner of the motorboat shall be notified by mail on the same notice required by KRS 134.805(5) of the date of expiration. In addition, the Transportation Cabinet shall provide appropriate forms and information to permit renewal of motorboat registration to be completed by mail. Any registration renewal by mail shall require payment of an additional two dollars ($2) fee which shall be received by the county clerk. Nonreceipt of the notice herein shall not constitute a defense to any registration related offense.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 163, § 18, effective January 1, 1990; 1990, ch. 391, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 2006, ch. 255, § 20, effective January 1, 2007.

235.070.
Contents of application — Documentation to be submitted — Certificate of registration or renewal denied, when.

Every person seeking a title and registration or renewal registration for operation of a motorboat shall apply to the county clerk of the county as provided in KRS

235.050

and make application on a form furnished by the Transportation Cabinet. The application shall contain the full name and signature, Social Security number or federal tax identification number, citizenship of applicant, date of birth, sex, present resident address, situs for ad valorem tax assessment, the make of the boat, hull identification number (HIN), if any, length, beam, model, and horsepower of motor, maximum capacity, type of hull material, intended use of the boat, and whether the fuel is gasoline, diesel, or other. The application shall state whether the motorboat is equipped with marine toilet facilities and shall state if the marine sanitation device for the toilet is properly operating and properly used for the water body where the motorboat is kept or operated. It shall also state whether the applicant has been previously licensed or registered as an owner, and if so, when and by what state or county, whether any license registration or certificate number has been canceled, suspended, revoked, or refused, and if so, the date of and reason for cancellation, suspension, revocation, or refusal, and such other information as may be required.

Every applicant shall submit the motorboat title or registration with the application as required below:

If the motorboat is titled in Kentucky, the applicant shall submit the title with the application for title and registration;

If the motorboat is registered in Kentucky but has not been titled in Kentucky, the applicant shall submit the certificate of registration with the application for title and registration;

If the applicant is applying for a registration renewal, he shall submit the certificate of registration;

If the motorboat is titled in another jurisdiction, the applicant shall submit the title with the application for title and registration;

If the motorboat is registered in another jurisdiction, but not titled in any jurisdiction, the applicant shall submit the certificate of registration with the application for title and registration; and

Vessels holding a United States certificate of documentation shall be exempt from the provisions of this section.

Every applicant shall certify that the statements made in the application are true. The clerk shall inform the applicant that making false statements on the application regarding a marine boat toilet may lead to being fined under KRS

235.990

.

The clerk shall, after determining that the applicant has complied with the law concerning applications, issue a current certificate of registration or renewal thereof.

No certificate of registration or renewal thereof for the operation of a motorboat shall be issued, if the motorboat is equipped with toilet facilities but is not equipped with a storage container or treatment or disposal system of a type approved under regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 7; 1968, ch. 133, § 1; 1974, ch. 292, § 6; 1978, ch. 233, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 263, § 4, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 163, § 7, effective January 1, 1990; 1990, ch. 391, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 71, § 6, effective July 15, 1998.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/15/98). 1998 Ky. Acts ch. 71, sec. 13 provides that the amendment to this statute in that Act “shall be enforced until July 15, 2000, only by the issuance of a warning and the distribution of information about Sections 1 to 8 of [that] Act.”

Opinions of Attorney General.

The members of a marina or boat club could not endow a particular person with the power of attorney to enable that person to register all the boats belonging to the members of the particular organization.

OAG 61-476

.

Failure of a boat with toilet facilities to be equipped with an approved antipollution device as required by this section and KRS

235.200

is grounds for denying a federal identification number pursuant to the Federal Boating Act of 1958.

OAG 69-502

.

The owner of a boat must apply for registration and execute the affidavit required by this section.

OAG 70-784

.

235.080.
Registration fees.

The annual registration fee for motorboats shall be set by the department by administrative regulation. Every application for registration or renewal of registration shall be accompanied by the registration fee in addition to a one dollar ($1) fee which shall be deposited in a trust and agency account for use by the Transportation Cabinet in defraying the cost of implementing and operating the boat titling and registration program.

The annual registration fee for motorboats for hire from a livery shall be the registration fees set forth in subsection (1) of this section. Owners of a livery shall apply for licenses or certificates in the manner provided in this chapter, but the Transportation Cabinet may promulgate special administrative regulations relating to their certification and registration.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 8; 1974, ch. 292, § 7; 1978, ch. 263, § 5, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 75, effective July 15, 1980; 1982, ch. 446, § 11, effective April 12, 1982; 1990, ch. 391, § 6, effective July 13, 1990; 1996, ch. 212, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 275, § 7, effective July 15, 1998.

235.085.
Fee to county clerk and Transportation Cabinet for issuing title and registration.

The county clerk shall be entitled to the same fee for the performance of the duties required in the issuance of certificates of title and registration for motorboats as is applicable to the issuance of certificates of title and registration of motor vehicles as provided by KRS 186.040(1),

186.180

,

186A.130

, and

186A.245

.

The Transportation Cabinet shall be entitled to the same fee for the performance of duties required in the issuance of certificates of title or duplicate titles for motorboats as is applicable to the issuance of certificates of title of motor vehicles as provided in KRS

186A.130

and

186A.245

. The Transportation Cabinet shall receive a two dollar ($2) fee when a motorboat owner is issued a replacement license decal for the operation of a motorboat. The fees shall be deposited in a trust and agency account for use by the Transportation Cabinet in defraying the cost of implementing, administering, and operating the boat titling and registration program.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 163, § 14, effective January 1, 1990; 1990, ch. 391, § 7, effective July 13, 1990; 2003, ch. 124, § 43, effective July 1, 2003.

235.090.
County clerk’s entry of information into automated vehicle information system — Report, application and fees to Transportation Cabinet.

The county clerk shall enter information relating to the registration and titling of boats into the automated vehicle information system. This information shall include the name and address of those persons who have applied for title and registration of motorboats, the length and type of the motorboat, and the title and registration fee charged, and the amount of title and registration fee collected from the applicant. The applications for title and registration and the fees collected by the clerk shall be forwarded to the Transportation Cabinet.

The county clerk shall submit a weekly report of all transactions involving boat titling and registration transactions to the Transportation Cabinet.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 9; 1974, ch. 292, § 8; 1976, (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 21, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 263, § 6, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 163, § 8, effective January 1, 1990; 1990, ch. 391, § 8, effective July 13, 1990.

235.100.
Procedure for issuing license.

After the county clerk has entered the information into the automated vehicle information system as required by KRS

235.090

, the Transportation Cabinet shall issue to the applicant a certificate of number stating the number awarded to the motorboat, the name and address of the owner, and any other information prescribed by the department.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 10; 1980, ch. 295, § 76, effective July 15, 1980; 1990, ch. 391, § 9, effective July 13, 1990.

235.110.
Display of number on boat — Specifications — Certificate of number to be kept available.

The owners shall cause to be painted on or attached to each side of the bow of the motorboat the identification number in such manner as may be prescribed by rules and regulations of the department in order that it may be clearly visible. The number shall be maintained in a legible condition. The certificate of number shall be pocket size and shall be available at all times for inspection on the motorboat for which issued, whenever such motorboat is in operation, except as provided in KRS

235.230

.

All numbers placed upon the bow of a motorboat subject to this numbering system shall be:

Painted on, or attached to, each side of the bow (i.e. the forward half) of the vessel;

Read from left to right;

And in such position as to provide maximum visibility;

In block letters of good proportion not less than three (3) inches in height;

Have spaces that are equal to the width of a letter other than “I” or a number other than “1” between the letter and the number groupings (Example: KY 1234 A);

Of a color which will contrast with the color of the background (i.e. dark numbers on a light background) and so maintained as to be clearly visible and legible.

No number other than the number awarded to a motorboat or granted reciprocity pursuant to this chapter shall be painted, attached, or otherwise displayed on either side of the bow of such motorboat.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, §§ 11, 21, 34; 1974, ch. 292, § 9; 1978, ch. 263, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 77, effective July 15, 1980.

235.120.
Boat that is already numbered.

The owner of any motorboat already covered by a number in full force and effect which has been awarded to it by the then operative federal law or a federally approved number system of another state shall record the number prior to operating the motorboat on the waters of this state in excess of the sixty (60) day reciprocity period provided for in KRS

235.210

, the fee for such recordation being the same as for an original registration as provided for in KRS

235.080

. Such recordation shall be in the manner and pursuant to the procedure required for the award of a number under KRS

235.050

to

235.070

, except that no additional or substitute number shall be issued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 12; 1978, ch. 263, § 8, effective June 17, 1978; 1978, ch. 384, § 96, effective June 17, 1978.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

This section was amended by two 1978 Acts that do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

235.125.
When owner shall remove number and validation sticker.

The person whose name appears on a certificate of number as the owner of a vessel shall remove the number and validation sticker from the vessel when:

The vessel is documented by the Coast Guard; or

The certificate of number is invalid under KRS

235.180

; or

The vessel is no longer principally used in the state where the certificate was issued.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 263, § 25, effective June 17, 1978.

235.130.
Procedure when ownership is transferred or owner renders motorboat unfit for future use.

No person acting for himself or another shall buy or trade for any motorboat without receiving the certificate of title issued for that boat with a certificate of transfer endorsed thereon. If the motorboat has not been issued a certificate of title as noted on the certificate of registration, the person shall receive a completed assignment of title on a boat transaction record and the certificate of registration.

It shall be the duty of the purchaser to promptly submit the endorsed certificate of title or boat transaction record and certificate of registration to the county clerk of the county of the purchaser’s residence or in which the motorboat is to be principally operated. The purchaser shall apply for a new certificate of title and registration pursuant to KRS

235.050

. The county clerk shall thereupon issue to the purchaser a transfer of registration bearing the same data and information. The clerk shall forward the endorsed certificate of title or boat transaction record and certificate of registration and new application for title and registration to the Transportation Cabinet. Except when registration is prohibited by law, any unexpired registration shall remain valid after transfer until expiration occurs according to law.

For transferring the registration, the clerk shall collect a fee of five dollars ($5). The clerk shall retain two dollars ($2), the Transportation Cabinet shall receive two dollars ($2) and the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources administratively attached to the Tourism, Arts and Heritage Cabinet shall receive one dollar ($1). The fee received by the Transportation Cabinet shall be deposited in a trust and agency account for use by the Transportation Cabinet in defraying the cost of implementing and operating the boat titling and registration program. The fee for transferring the title shall be as required by KRS

235.085

.

If a transferee does not promptly submit the necessary documents to the county clerk as required by law in order to complete the transfer transaction, a transferor may submit to the county clerk, after the passage of fifteen (15) calendar days, in his county of residence, an affidavit that he has transferred his interest in a specific motorboat and the clerk may enter appropriate data into the AVIS system which would restrict any registration transaction from occurring on that vehicle until the transfer was processed.

If the owner junks or otherwise renders a motorboat unfit for future use, he shall deliver the title to the county clerk of the county in which the motorboat is junked. The county clerk shall immediately return the title to the Transportation Cabinet. The owner shall pay to the county clerk fifty cents ($0.50) for his services.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 13; 1974, ch. 292, § 10; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 21, § 22, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 263, § 9, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 163, § 10, effective January 1, 1990; 1990, ch. 391, § 10, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 118, § 4, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 48, § 20, effective July 15, 1998; 2005, ch. 95, § 47, effective June 20, 2005; 2009, ch. 16, § 62, effective June 25, 2009; 2022 ch. 197, § 10, effective March 30, 2022.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(10/23/90). Pursuant to KRS 7.136(1), the prior reference to KRS

230.050

in subsection (2) of this statute has been changed to KRS

235.050

to correct a manifest typographical error.

235.140.
Relation of numbering system to federal system.

The numbering system employed pursuant to this chapter shall be in conformity with the overall system of identification numbering adopted by the appropriate agency of the United States government for motorboats within the United States.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 14.

235.150.
Cabinet or county clerk to assign same numbers as far as practicable.

The Transportation Cabinet or county clerk shall insofar as is practicable assign to each motorboat the number previously assigned thereto upon each subsequent registration or transfer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 15; 1974, ch. 292, § 11; 1978, ch. 263, § 10, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 163, § 10, effective January 1, 1990; 1990, ch. 391, § 11, effective July 13, 1990.

235.160.
Registration records to be public.

All registration records of the Transportation Cabinet made or kept pursuant to the issuance of a certificate of number shall be public records.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 16; 1974, ch. 292, § 12; 1978, ch. 263, § 11, effective June 17, 1978; 1990, ch. 391, § 12, effective July 13, 1990.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Records management by agencies, KRS

171.680

.

235.170.
Year-long effectiveness of licenses — Expiration date.

Every certificate of number awarded pursuant to this chapter shall continue in full force and effect for a period of one (1) year unless sooner terminated or discontinued in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

The certificates of number shall expire on April 30 of each year and no longer shall be in force unless renewed pursuant to this chapter.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, §§ 17, 18; 1974, ch. 292, § 13.

235.180.
Termination of license by transfer, destruction or abandonment.

The owner shall furnish the county clerk notice of the transfer of all or any part of his interest other than the creation of a security interest in a motorboat numbered in this state pursuant to the provisions of this chapter or of the destruction or abandonment of the motorboat, within fifteen (15) days thereof. The transfer, destruction, or abandonment shall terminate the certificate of title and registration number for the motorboat, except, that in the case of a part interest which does not affect the owner’s right to operate the motorboat, the transfer shall not terminate the certificate of title and registration number.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 19; 1988, ch. 163, § 11, effective January 1, 1990.

235.190.
Licensee’s change of address — Notice of theft or recovery required.

Any holder of a certificate of registration shall notify the county clerk within fifteen (15) days if his address no longer conforms to the address appearing on the certificate and shall, as a part of the notification, furnish the county clerk with his new address. The department may provide in its administrative regulations for the surrender of the certificate bearing the former address and its replacement with a certificate bearing the new address or for the alteration of an outstanding certificate to show the new address of the holder.

Any holder of a certificate shall give notice to the department within fifteen (15) days of the theft or recovery of a vessel to which he is the holder of the certificate of number.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 20; 1974, ch. 292, § 14; 1978, ch. 263, § 12, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 78, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 404, § 3, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 163, § 12, effective January 1, 1990; 1998, ch. 23, § 3, effective July 15, 1998.

235.200.
Required equipment — Prohibition against operation without required equipment.

Every vessel shall have aboard:

Personal floatation devices of the type and quantity as prescribed by the United States Coast Guard;

When in operation during hours of darkness, or during times of poor visibility, such lights as prescribed by administrative regulations of the department;

If carrying or using any inflammable or toxic fluid in any inclosure for any purpose, and if not an entirely open motorboat, an efficient natural or mechanical ventilation system which shall be capable of removing resulting gases prior to and during the time such motorboat is occupied by any person;

Such additional equipment designed to promote the safety of navigation and of persons as the department may find to be appropriate and for which it has provided in its administrative regulations;

If such motorboat is equipped with toilet facilities, a storage container or a treatment or disposal system of size and construction sufficient to protect and preserve the waters of this state from pollution. The storage container or treatment or disposal system shall conform to the construction, performance, and utilization criteria as may be established by regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter;

The certificate number.

Except during an authorized race or regatta, which shall include trial runs in preparation for such race or regatta to be conducted at a time and place designated by the department, it shall be illegal to operate any motorboat without an effective exhaust muffling system, or in any manner which renders the exhaust muffling system ineffective in muffling the sound of engine exhaust.

No person shall operate or give permission for the operation of a motorboat which is not equipped as required by this section or modification thereof or which is not safe for operation as a motorboat.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 22; 1968, ch. 133, § 2; 1974, ch. 292, § 15; 1978, ch. 263, § 13, effective June 17, 1978; 1998, ch. 23, § 4, effective July 15, 1998.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Failure of a boat with toilet facilities to be equipped with an approved antipollution device as required by this section and KRS

235.070

is grounds for denying a federal identification number pursuant to the Federal Boating Act of 1958.

OAG 69-502

.

There is no authority where it has been held that the states cannot require motor vehicles or motorboats to have a muffler on exhaust systems, and since the states have such authority, it follows that the states can require the muffling system to be “effective.”

OAG 80-588

.

235.203.
Flotation device for child under twelve on moving boat — Exceptions.

All persons under twelve (12) years of age in an open boat or on an open deck of a vessel being used for recreational purposes on the waters of this state shall wear a personal flotation device approved by the United States Coast Guard while the vessel is underway. Any personal flotation devices required by this section shall be in good and serviceable condition, appropriately sized, and properly worn by the person. It shall be unlawful for any person to operate a vessel in violation of this subsection.

No boat or watercraft owner or operator shall permit a child under the age of twelve (12) years to violate subsection (1) of this section.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to a child who is a passenger on a commercial vessel licensed by the United States Coast Guard for the transportation of passengers for hire or to a toll ferry operating pursuant to a certificate of convenience and necessity or a perpetual and irrevocable franchise operating pursuant to KRS

280.010

to

280.110

.

A charge under subsection (1) or (2) of this section shall be dismissed if the defendant provides to the county attorney or the court proof that the person who was alleged to be under twelve (12) years of age was actually twelve (12) years of age or older. If the information is provided to the county attorney and the county attorney deems the proof sufficient, the county attorney shall seek dismissal of the charge and the defendant shall not be required to appear in court. If the information is presented in court and the court deems the proof sufficient, the court shall dismiss the charge. In either case, court costs shall not be assessed.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 474, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

235.205.
Use of sirens and flashing blue lights restricted.

No vessel equipped with a siren or a flashing, rotating, or oscillating blue light may be operated upon waterways of this state except boats operated by the department or law-enforcement vessels of any law-enforcement agency of the Commonwealth having jurisdiction upon the waters of this state or law-enforcement vessels of the United States authorized by federal law or regulations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1974, ch. 292, § 26; 1998, ch. 23, § 5, effective July 15, 1998.

235.210.
Boats exempt from registration requirement.

A motorboat shall not be required to be numbered under this chapter if it is:

Already covered by a number in full force and effect which has been awarded to it pursuant to federal law or a federally approved numbering system of another state; provided, that such boat shall not have been within this state for a period in excess of sixty (60) consecutive days;

A motorboat from a country other than the United States temporarily using the waters of this state;

A motorboat whose owner is the United States, a state or a subdivision thereof, except when such boat is leased to the public for compensation it must be registered according to KRS 235.080(2);

A ship’s lifeboat used or intended to be used as such;

A motorboat belonging to a class of boats which has been exempted from numbering by the department after said agency has found that the numbering of motorboats of such class will not materially aid in their identification; and, if an agency of the federal government has a numbering system applicable to the class of motorboats to which the motorboat in question belongs, after the department has further found that the motorboat would also be exempt from numbering if it were subject to the federal law.

Boats exempt from registration may be required by the department to apply for an official identification number to be displayed in accordance with KRS

235.110

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 68, Art. VIII, § 23; 1974, ch. 292, § 16; 1978, ch. 263, § 14, effective June 17, 1978; 1980, ch. 295, § 79, effective July 15, 1980.